District of Columbia statutes.
22-1103

Repealed

Wilful neglect or refusal to support wife or minor child; punishment; order of allowance; recognizance; trial under original charge

Repealed.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 586, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 165(a), (b)
1981 Ed., §§ 22-903 to 22-906.